Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Cross references.

Functions of county, municipal, and other housing authorities pertaining to provision of housing for persons engaged in national defense industries or activities, §

8-3-130

et seq.

Special license plates for members of United States military reserve, §

40-2-64

.

Special license plates for members of Georgia National Guard, §

40-2-65

.

Prohibition against employment discrimination by state agencies against servicemen’s wives, § 45-2-9.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 561), the General Assembly directed the Department of Defense and the Department of Veterans Service to design and strike the Georgia Medal of Honor.

Law reviews.

For note, “Rethinking the Role and Regulation of Private Military Companies: What the United States and United Kingdom Can Learn from Shared Experiences in the War on Terror,” see 39 Ga. J. Int’l & Comp. L. 445 (2011).